Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1939SV (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. 552 Section 1. ANTI-OBESITY MEDICATION REVIEW AND REPORT. For 1 purposes of the medical assistance program under chapter 249A 2 and health insurance plans for state employees established 3 pursuant to chapter 509A, the department of health and human 4 services and the department of administrative services shall 5 review anti-obesity medications, including GLP-1 agonists, 6 for effectiveness relating to weight loss, the impact 7 on comorbidities, the potential for cost savings due to 8 deferred medical procedures and reduced medications related 9 to comorbidity, recommended eligibility requirements, any 10 short-term and long-term costs associated with coverage, 11 and any other criteria the departments deem relevant. The 12 department of health and human services and the department of 13 administrative services shall submit a report to the general 14 assembly by January 5, 2026, with the departmentsâ findings, 15 proposed eligibility requirements, and any short-term and 16 long-term costs associated with coverage. 17